Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 7

Utility Management Review Board

7-82-701. Created — Authority — Composition — Terms — Chair.

There is hereby created in the office of comptroller of the treasury a utility management review board for the purpose of advising utility district boards of commissioners in the area of utility management. The utility management review board created by this section is vested with authority over all utility districts established pursuant to this chapter or by any public or private act.

The board shall be composed of nine (9) members as follows:

The commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designee;

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, who shall serve as chair; and

Seven (7) members appointed by the governor, three (3) of whom shall be experienced utility district managers, three (3) of whom shall be experienced utility district commissioners and one (1) of whom shall be a consumer residing in the state who may have experience in residential development but is not engaged in utility district management or operation. The consumer member shall be appointed for a four-year term of office at the expiration of the term of office of a utility district manager first occurring after June 11, 2009.

The governor shall consult with the Tennessee Association of Utility Districts (TAUD) as to qualified individuals to be appointed to the board.

Members shall be appointed to four-year terms; provided, that the initial appointments shall be for terms, not to exceed four (4) years, as shall be necessary so that the terms of no more than two (2) members of the board shall end in any one (1) year.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment.]

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10; 1989, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 918, § 1; 2002, ch. 603, § 11; 2007, ch. 86, § 1; 2009, ch. 423, § 2; 2015, ch. 140, §§ 4, 5; 2017, ch. 129, § 1; 2018, ch. 688, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For attachment of the utility management review board to the department of health, see Executive Order No. 21 (June 28, 1988).

The utility management review board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “who shall serve as chair” at the end of (b)(2) and deleted (e), which read: “Every two (2) years the board shall elect a chair from among its members and such other officers as it may deem necessary.”

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “private act” for “public or private act” in the second and third sentences, deleted “Effective July 1, 1989, notwithstanding any law to the contrary,” from the beginning of the second sentence, and, in the last sentence, inserted a comma preceding “or instrumentalities” and deleted “, other than those agencies, authorities or instrumentalities of government electing pursuant to §68-221-1006(a) or §68-221-1206(a) to come under the jurisdiction of the water and waste water financing board” from the end.

The 2018 amendment, in (a), substituted “any public or private act” for “any private act” at the end of the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “For purposes of this part, ‘utility district’ includes agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of government created by private act having the authority to administer a water or wastewater facility.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 688, § 3. April 9, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction over the Reelfoot Lake Regional Utility and Planning District, OAG 96-010, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/30/96).

Utility management review board's authority over gas utility districts, OAG 99-031, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/18/99).

7-82-702. Powers and duties.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this part, the board has the power and authority to:

Promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of the affairs of the board;

Adopt a seal for the board, prescribe the style of the seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

Subject to title 9, chapter 4, appoint and fix the salaries and duties of such experts, agents and employees as it deems necessary;

Make and enter into contracts;

Accept gifts, grants or other moneys and receive appropriations that may be made by law;

Give advisory technical assistance to any utility district upon request;

Review and conduct an informal hearing of any decision of any utility district under § 7-82-402(a) upon simple written request of any utility district customer or any member of the public within thirty (30) days after such decision. In making its decision as to whether the published rates are too high or too low, the utility management review board shall take into account the reasonableness of the utility district's rules, policies, and cost of service as well as any evidence presented during the hearing. Any judicial review of any decision of the board will be held by common law certiorari within the county in which the hearing was held;

Upon the failure of the board of commissioners of a utility district to adopt the rules and regulations required by § 7-82-402(b) or any other section of this chapter or, upon the failure of a utility district to consider and resolve consumer complaints in accordance with such rules and regulations, establish an alternate mechanism for consideration and resolution of such complaints through an informal hearing process. In making its decision as to whether the complaint was resolved in accordance with the utility district's rules and regulations, the utility management review board shall also take into account the reasonableness of the utility district's application of its rules, policies, and cost of service as well as any evidence presented during the hearing. Any judicial review of any decision of the board will be held by common law certiorari within the county in which the hearing was held;

Review and conduct an informal hearing of any decision of any utility district upon a written request of any utility district customer or an affected developer concerning the justness and reasonableness of the utility district's requirement that the customer or the developer build utility systems to be dedicated to the utility district or the justness and reasonableness of fees or charges against the customer or the developer related to the utility systems. The written complaint must be filed within thirty (30) days after the utility board has taken action upon a written complaint to the board of commissioners of the utility district. In making its decision as to whether the requirements, fees, or charges are just and reasonable, the utility management review board shall take into account the reasonableness of the utility district's rules, policies, and cost of service as well as any evidence presented during the hearing. Any judicial review of any decision of the board will be held by common law certiorari within the county in which the hearing was held;

From time to time, submit to the governor or the comptroller of the treasury its suggestions for proposed amendments to this chapter;

Exercise all the powers and take all the actions necessary, proper or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this part;

Issue subpoenas requiring attendance of witnesses and production of such evidence as requested; administer oaths; and take such testimony as the board deems necessary in fulfilling its purpose. If a person or entity refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the board under this part, the chancery court of Davidson County shall have jurisdiction upon application of the board to issue an order requiring such person to appear and testify or produce evidence as the case may require, and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as contempt;

Conduct a contested case hearing and issue an order on the question of whether a member or members of a utility district board should be removed from office and a new board or member appointed or elected as provided in § 7-82-307(b);

Conduct a contested case hearing and issue an order on the question of whether a utility district that fills vacancies on its board using a method other than appointment by a county mayor or mayors should be required to begin filling vacancies under the uniform method for the filling of vacancies set forth by § 7-82-307(a)(4) and (5) as provided in § 7-82-307(c);

Establish, adopt and promulgate in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, rules that the board deems necessary for the training of utility district commissioners;

Establish, adopt and promulgate in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, rules to define excessive water losses for utility districts;

Review and approve, by order, the model of ethical standards prepared by the Tennessee Association of Utility Districts (TAUD) for water, wastewater and gas authorities created by a private act or under the general law and for utility districts pursuant to § 8-17-105(b); and review and find, by order, that the ethical standards adopted by any water, wastewater or gas authority created by a private act or under the general law or a utility district that differ from the TAUD model are more stringent than the TAUD model;

Hear and act upon the request for utility service by or for a utility district customer made pursuant to § 7-82-112; and

[Deleted by 2015 amendment.]

In the conduct of any informal hearing upon request or complaint, the board may receive affidavit evidence, in addition to minutes, transcripts, and other evidence of actions by the utility district, and may render its decision thereon or, if it shall deem an open hearing appropriate, may order the interested parties be notified of the date, time, and place that such hearing will be held.

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10; 1990, ch. 732, § 1; 1992, ch. 788, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 918, § 2; 2000, ch. 721, § 1; 2004, ch. 618, § 4; 2007, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 405, § 4; 2008, ch. 852, § 2; 2009, ch. 423, § 1; 2013, ch. 141, § 4; 2015, ch. 140, §§ 7, 8; 2016, ch. 590, § 2; 2017, ch. 129, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 618, § 1 provided that the act shall be known, and may be cited as, the “Utility District Commissioner Selection Reform Act of 2004”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(7)-(9), which read: “(7) Review any decision of any utility district under §7-82-402, regardless of exemptions or exclusions as may be enumerated in §7-82-103, upon simple written request of any utility district customer or any member of the public within thirty (30) days after such decision, with any judicial review of any decision of the board thereon, to be held by common law certiorari within the county of the utility district's principal office;“(8) Upon the failure of the board of commissioners of a utility district to adopt the rules and regulations required by §7-82-402(b), regardless of exemptions or exclusions as may be enumerated in §7-82-103, or any other section of this chapter or, upon the failure of a utility district to consider and resolve consumer complaints in accordance with such rules and regulations, establish an alternate mechanism for consideration and resolution of such complaints;“(9) In the conduct of any hearing upon request or complaint, the board may receive affidavit evidence, in addition to minutes, transcripts, and other evidence of actions by the utility district, and may render its decision thereon or, if it shall deem an open hearing appropriate, may order the interested parties be notified of the date, time and place that such hearing will be held;”; deleted (a)(19), which read: “Review and conduct a hearing of any decision of any utility district upon a written request of any utility district customer or an affected developer concerning the justness and reasonableness of the utility district's requirement that the customer or the developer build utility systems to be dedicated to the utility district or the justness and reasonableness of fees or charges against the customer or the developer related to the utility systems. The written complaint must be filed within thirty (30) days after the utility board has taken action upon a written complaint to the board of commissioners of the utility district. In making its decision as to whether the requirements, fees or charges are just and reasonable, the utility management review board shall take into account the reasonableness of the utility district's rules, policies and cost of service as well as any evidence presented during the hearing. Any judicial review of a decision of the board is by common law certiorari with the county of the utility district's principal office as the proper venue.” and added (b).

The 2016 amendment inserted “or the comptroller of the treasury” following “governor” in (a)(10).

The 2017 amendment deleted “, regardless of exemptions or exclusions as may be enumerated in §7-82-103,” following “under §7-82-402(a),” in the first sentence of (a)(7); and deleted “, regardless of exemptions or exclusions as may be enumerated in §7-82-103,” following “required by §7-82-402(b)” in the first sentence of (a)(8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 590, § 3. March 10, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction of the utility management review board, OAG 93-26, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/29/93).

Utility management review board's authority over gas utility districts, OAG 99-031, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/18/99).

7-82-703. Financially distressed utility districts — Audited annual financial reports — Adoption of prescribed rate structures.

The comptroller of the treasury shall cause to be filed with the board a copy of the audited annual financial report of a financially distressed utility district prepared pursuant to § 7-82-401 within sixty (60) days from the date that the audit is filed with the comptroller of the treasury.

After reviewing the audited annual financial report and operations of the financially distressed utility district, and after holding a public hearing within the service area of such utility district, the board may prescribe a rate structure to be adopted by the financially distressed utility district to cause such utility district to eliminate negative changes in net position, to liquidate in an orderly fashion any deficit total net position or to cure a default on any indebtedness of the district, or any combination of these.

In the event the board of commissioners of the financially distressed utility district fails to adopt the prescribed rate structure, the utility management review board shall petition the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which the utility district is operating to require the adoption of the rate structure prescribed by the board or such other remedial actions that, in the opinion of the court, may be required to cause the utility district to be operated in accordance with state law.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, nothing in this section shall preclude a public utility district from operating water and sewer systems as individual or combined entities.

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10; 2004, ch. 619, §§ 8, 9; 2008, ch. 700, §§ 2-4; 2009, ch. 72, § 2; 2014, ch. 628, §§ 9, 10; 2016, ch. 590, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “pursuant to §7-82-401 within sixty (60) days from the date that the audit is filed with the comptroller of the treasury” for “pursuant to §7-82-401” at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 590, § 3. March 10, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. Comptroller's authority to report financially distressed gas utility districts, OAG 99-031, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/18/99).

Requirements for utility rates, OAG 05-165 (10/25/05).

7-82-704. Financially distressed utility districts — Consolidation.

When a utility district is financially distressed or is financially unable to expand the amount or type of service or services as set forth and described in its petition for creation pursuant to § 7-82-201, the utility management review board may consider the consolidation of the utility district with another utility district or districts, municipal utility system or county utility system to restore financial stability and to ensure continued operations for the benefit of the public being served by the utility district. The utility management review board may initiate and participate in negotiations among the utility district, any other utility district, municipal utility system or county utility system with whom the utility district may consolidate and any other affected parties concerning a consolidation. In the event the utility management review board determines that such a consolidation is in the best interest of the public being served by the utility district and the utility management review board is able to negotiate an agreement among all affected parties for the consolidation, the utility management review board shall enter an order approving the consolidation agreement and shall require the utility district to enter into the consolidation agreement. If the utility management review board determines that the utility district, any other utility district, municipal utility system or county utility system with whom the utility district may consolidate, or any other affected party, has refused or failed to enter into good faith negotiations on a consolidation, then the utility management review board shall petition the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which the utility district is operating to require the party or parties to engage in good faith negotiations concerning a consolidation.

In the event the board of commissioners of the utility district does not enter into the approved consolidation agreement or fails to abide by the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement, then the utility management review board shall petition the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which the utility district is operating to enforce the utility management review board's order to require the board of commissioners to enter into the approved consolidation agreement and to abide by and implement all of the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement.

In order to mitigate any negative financial impact of such a consolidation on the utility district or districts, municipal utility system or county utility system agreeing to consolidate with a financially distressed utility district, the board is hereby authorized to develop a plan of mitigation payments to such consolidated utility system. Such mitigation payments shall be made from funds available in the utility district revitalization fund and shall include amounts to offset increased administrative costs relating to the consolidation, to the extent such costs cannot reasonably be recovered from customer revenues or other assets of the financially distressed utility district, amounts that may be necessary to cure a default on indebtedness of the financially distressed utility district to the extent such defaults can, in the opinion of the board, reasonably be cured, amounts that may be necessary to renovate and repair the facilities of the financially distressed utility district to the level necessary to enable the consolidated utility system to provide continued service to the public being served by the financially distressed utility district, and other such payments as may be necessary in the opinion of the board to accomplish such a consolidation and mitigate the financial impact of the consolidation.

The board shall contract with a resulting consolidated utility system to provide for the repayment of any such mitigation payments over a period of time as may be agreed upon by the board and the consolidated utility system. Such repayments may be made from surcharges levied upon the customers in the service area of the financially distressed utility district being consolidated; provided, that such surcharges shall not result in user fees in the service area of the financially distressed utility district being in excess of the maximum level of users fees as may be determined by the board to be reasonable for the service area. Upon a determination by the board that repayment of the mitigation payments would be unduly burdensome and financially detrimental to the customers of such utility system, the board may waive repayments required pursuant to this section; provided, that any such waiver must be approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Any repayments that may be received by the board pursuant to this section shall be deposited into and shall become part of the utility district revitalization fund.

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10; 2011, ch. 215, § 2.

7-82-705. Reports — Amendments to chapter.

The board shall report annually to the governor and the general assembly on the activities of the board for the preceding year. The board shall receive and consider from any source whatever, whether private or governmental, suggestions for amendments to this chapter, and, on the basis of the suggestions, shall either recommend amendments under §7-82-702(10) or shall report to the suggesting party, in writing, its reasons for not recommending such proposed amendment.

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10.

Cross-References. Reporting requirements satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of reports, §3-1-114.

7-82-706. Legislative intent.

In carrying out this part, the board shall be deemed to be acting for the public welfare and in furtherance of the general assembly's intent that utility districts be operated as self-sufficient enterprises.

Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 10.

7-82-707, 7-82-708. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§7-82-707,7-82-708 (Acts 1987, ch. 422, §§ 10, 12-14; 1989, ch. 139, § 8; 1989, ch. 221, § 10), concerning the utility management review board, were repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 400, §§ 3 and 4, effective July 1, 1989.

7-82-709. Authority of board to investigate compliance with federal and state law.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the utility management review board has the authority to investigate utility districts under its jurisdiction pursuant to § 7-82-701(a), and may include the assistance of the department of environment and conservation and the comptroller of the treasury; determine the financial, technical, and managerial capacity of the systems to comply with the requirements of any applicable federal and state acts; and require systems to take appropriate action to correct any deficiencies in such areas, including, but not limited to, changes in ownership, management, accounting, rates, maintenance, consolidation, alternative water supply, or other procedures.

The utility management review board shall have the authority to investigate public water systems of utility districts whose water loss as reported in the utility district's annual audit is excessive as established by rules determined by the board. In the event a utility district fails to take the appropriate actions required by the board to reduce water loss to an acceptable level, the utility management review board may petition the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which the utility district is operating to require the utility district to take such actions.

Acts 1997, ch. 483, § 23; 2007, ch. 86, § 2; 2007, ch. 243, § 3; 2013, ch. 141, § 5; 2018, ch. 713, § 1; 2020, ch. 627, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted the last sentence in (a) which read: “The utility management review board also may approve or disapprove such corrections as a condition for any public water system of a utility district to receive assistance from the authority under §68-221-1206(a)(3).”

The 2020 amendment, rewrote (a), which read: “Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the utility management review board shall have the authority, in the case of public water systems of utility districts, to investigate, with the assistance of the department of environment and conservation and the comptroller of the treasury, and determine the financial, technical, and managerial capacity of the systems to comply with the requirements of the federal and the state acts; and to require systems to take appropriate action to correct any deficiencies in such areas, including, but not limited to, changes in ownership, management, accounting, rates, maintenance, consolidation, alternative water supply, or other procedures.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 713, § 2. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 627, § 10. March 20, 2020.